Utah statutes.
78A-6-303.   Rules of procedure -- Ex parte communications.

(1)  The Utah Rules of Civil Procedure and the Utah Rules of Juvenile Procedure apply to abuse, neglect, and dependency proceedings unless the provisions of this part specify otherwise.

(2)  Any unauthorized ex parte communication concerning a pending case between a judge and a party to an abuse, neglect, or dependency proceeding shall be recorded for subsequent review, if necessary, by the Judicial Conduct Commission.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

